Hawaii statutes.
[§137-3] Action. (a) Whenever a
government entity seeks reimbursement of search and rescue expenses, including
expenses paid or owing to private persons or entities by the government entity,
in connection with a search and rescue, the government entity may bring an
action in any court of competent jurisdiction; provided the reimbursement
sought shall not in any case exceed the total cost incurred for the search and
rescue operation.

(b) This chapter is not intended to restrict
or diminish the right of any government entity to settle or compromise its
rights provided in this chapter. [L 1999, c 66, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next